California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 69, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

19222.

For the purposes of this section, if any certified, treasurer's, or cashier’s check (or other guaranteed draft), or any money order received in payment of any liability imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part is not duly paid, the state shall, in addition to its right to exact payment from the party originally indebted therefor, have a perfected and enforceable state tax lien for the amount of that check (or draft) upon all the assets of the financial institution on
 which drawn or for the amount of that money order upon all the assets of the issuer thereof. The lien referred to in the preceding sentence shall be subject to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19223.

Upon recordation or filing of a notice of state tax lien pursuant to Section 7171 of the Government Code by the Franchise Tax Board for any taxes due from the grantor of a trust on income of the trust which is taxable to the grantor under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), and upon its giving notice of the recording or filing pursuant to Section 7171 of the Government Code to the fiduciary of the trust, or in case there is more than one fiduciary to any one of the fiduciaries, the amount of the taxes constitutes a lien upon all
 the real or personal property of the trust in the county owned by the trust or afterwards and before the lien expires acquired by the trust. The lien has the force, effect, and priority of a lien created pursuant to Section 19221.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19224.

The notice required to be given by Section 19223 may be served upon the fiduciary personally, or by mail; if by mail, service shall be made pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure and shall be addressed to the fiduciary at his or her address as it appears in the records of the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19225.

(a) (1) The Franchise Tax Board shall notify in writing the person described in Section 19221 of the filing or recording of a notice of state tax lien as provided under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 7220) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(2) The notice required under paragraph (1) shall be mailed in accordance with Section 2885 of the Civil Code no less than five business days after the day of the filing of the notice of lien.

(3) The notice shall specify, in simple and nontechnical terms, all of the following:

(A) The amount of unpaid tax.

(B) The right of the person to request a review during the 15-day period beginning on the day after the five-day period described in paragraph (2).

(C) The independent departmental administrative review available to the taxpayer with respect to the lien and the procedures to obtain that review.

(D) The procedures relating to the
 release of liens on property.

(b) (1) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate shall establish procedures for an independent departmental administrative review requested under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(2) A person shall be entitled to only one review under this section with respect to the taxable period to which the unpaid tax specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) relates.

(3) An independent departmental administrative review under this subdivision shall be conducted by an officer or employee, or officers or employees, who have had no prior involvement with respect to the unpaid tax specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) before the first review under this section or Section 21015.5. A taxpayer may waive the requirement of
 this paragraph. Administrative review under this paragraph is not subject to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(4) To the extent practicable, a review under this section shall be held in conjunction with a review under Section 21015.5.

(c) For purposes of this section, subdivision (c) of Section 21015.5 shall apply.

(d) This section is operative for any collection action initiated after the date which is 180 days after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 348, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Applicable as provided in subd. (d).)
-------------------------------------------

19226.

(a) At the request of the owner whose property is subject to any lien under Section 19221, the Franchise Tax Board shall issue a release of lien from that property if the owner is not the person whose unsatisfied liability gave rise to the lien and the owner does either of the following:

(1) Deposits with the Franchise Tax Board an amount of money equal to the value of the interest of the state (as determined by the Franchise Tax Board) in the property.

(2) Furnishes a bond acceptable to the Franchise Tax Board in a like amount.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board shall refund the amount so deposited, pay interest at the overpayment rate under Section 19521, and release the bond, to the extent the Franchise Tax Board determines that either of the following apply:

(1) The unsatisfied liability giving rise to the lien can be satisfied from a source other than the property for which the deposit or bond is made.

(2) The value of the interest of the state in the property is less than the Franchise Tax Board’s prior determination of the value.

(c) If no request is made under subdivision (d), within the period prescribed, the Franchise Tax Board shall do
 both of the following within 60 days after the expiration of the period:

(1) Apply the amount deposited or collected on the bond, to the extent necessary to satisfy the unsatisfied liability secured by the lien.

(2) Refund (with interest at the overpayment rate under Section 19521) any portion of the amount deposited which is not used to satisfy the liability.

(d) If a release is issued pursuant to this section, the owner may, within 60 days after the day on which the release is issued, request the Franchise Tax Board as provided under subdivision (f) to determine whether the value of the interest of the state (if any) is less than the Franchise Tax Board’s prior determination of the value. No other action may be brought by the owner for a determination.

(e) This section shall not limit the circumstances in which the Franchise Tax Board may release a lien under any circumstances to facilitate the collection of the tax liability or, if that release is in the best interest of the taxpayer and the state, take any action associated with the release of that lien it deems appropriate.

(f) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate shall establish procedures for an independent departmental administrative review for requests made under subdivision (d). This administrative review shall not be subject to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code. If the administrative review determines that the Franchise Tax Board’s previous determination of the value of the interest of the state in the property for purposes of this section exceeds the actual value of the state’s interest, the board shall provide a refund of the amount deposited and a release of the bond,
 to the extent that the aggregate of the amounts thereof exceeds the value so determined. In the case of a refund issued pursuant to this subdivision, interest shall be allowed at the rate prescribed for overpayments from the date the Franchise Tax Board receives the amount to the date of refund.

(g) This section shall be operative on the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 21.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Warrant for Collection of Tax [19231. - 19236.]

19231.

The Franchise Tax Board or its authorized representative may issue a warrant for the collection of any tax, interest, or penalty and for the enforcement of any lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19232.

The warrant shall be directed to any sheriff, marshal, or the Department of the California Highway Patrol and shall have the same force and effect as a writ of execution. The warrant shall be levied and sale made pursuant to it in the same manner and with the same force and effect as a levy of and sale pursuant to a writ of execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 448.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19233.

The Franchise Tax Board shall pay or advance to the sheriff, marshal, or the Department of the California Highway Patrol the same fees, commissions, and expenses as are provided by law for similar services pursuant to a writ of execution. The Franchise Tax Board, and not the court, shall approve the fees for publication in a newspaper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 449.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19234.

The fees, commissions, and expenses are an obligation of the taxpayer and may be collected from the taxpayer by virtue of the warrant or in any other manner provided in this part for the collection of a tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19235.

Whenever property is levied upon by warrant pursuant to Section 19231, the reasonable costs associated with the sale of that property, including, but not limited to, appraisers’ fees, auctioneers’ fees, and advertising fees are an obligation of the taxpayer and may be collected from the taxpayer by virtue of the warrant or in any other manner provided in this part for the collection of tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19236.

For purposes of issuing a warrant pursuant to this article:

(a) (1) No levy may be issued on any property or right to property to be sold in accordance with the Code of Civil Procedure until a thorough investigation of the status of the property has been completed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), an investigation of the status of any property shall include all of the
 following:

(A) A verification of the taxpayer’s liability.

(B) The completion of an analysis to determine whether the expense of the sale process to the state exceeds the liability for which the levy would be issued.

(C) The determination that the equity in the property is sufficient to yield net proceeds from the sale of the property to apply to the liability.

(D) A thorough consideration of alternative collection methods.

(b) If the amount of the levy does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), no levy may be issued on either of the following:

(1) Any real property used as a residence by the taxpayer.

(2) Any real property of the taxpayer (other than real property which is rented) used by any other individual as a residence.

(c) Notwithstanding the investigation required under subdivision (a):

(1) The principal residence of the taxpayer may not be sold except in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 704.710) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9 of the Code of Civil Procedure, which requires a court order for sale.

(2) Tangible personal property or real property (other than real property which is rented or a principal residence) used in the trade or business of an individual taxpayer may not be levied unless:

(A) The levy is approved in writing by the assistant executive
 officer for collection (or delegate), or

(B) The Franchise Tax Board finds that collection of tax is in jeopardy. The officer, or delegate, may not approve a levy under subparagraph (A) unless the officer determines that the taxpayer’s other assets subject to collection are insufficient to pay the amount due, together with expenses of the proceedings.

(d) This section shall be operative for any warrant issued on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 647, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Miscellaneous Provisions [19251. - 19266.]

19251.

The remedies of the state provided for in this chapter are cumulative, and no action taken by the Franchise Tax Board constitutes an election by the state to pursue any remedy to the exclusion of any other remedy for which provision is made in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19252.

In all proceedings under this chapter the Franchise Tax Board may act on behalf of the people of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19253.

The amounts required to be paid by any person under this part together with interest and penalties shall be satisfied first in any of the following cases:

(a) Whenever the person is insolvent.

(b) Whenever the person makes a voluntary assignment of assets.

(c) Whenever the estate of the person in the hands of executors, administrators, or
 heirs is insufficient to pay all the debts due from the deceased.

(d) Whenever the estate and effects of an absconding, concealed, or absent person required to pay any amount under this part are levied upon by process of law.

This section does not give the state a preference over any lien or security interest which was recorded or perfected prior to the time when the state records or files its lien as provided in Section 7171 of the Government Code.

The preference given to the state by this section shall be subordinate to the preferences given to claims for personal services by Sections 1204 and 1206 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19254.

(a) (1) If any person, other than an organization exempt from taxation under Section 23701, fails to pay any amount of tax, penalty, addition to tax, interest, or other liability imposed and delinquent under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), Part 32 (commencing with Section 61000), Title 25 (commencing with Section 100800) of the Government Code,
 or this part, a collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed if the Franchise Tax Board has mailed notice to that person for payment that advises that continued failure to pay the amount due may result in collection action, including the imposition of a collection cost recovery fee. The collection cost recovery fee shall be in the amount of:

(A) In the case of an individual, partnership, limited liability company classified as a partnership for California income tax purposes, or fiduciary, eighty-eight dollars ($88) or an amount as adjusted under subdivision (b).

(B) In the case of a corporation or limited liability company classified as a corporation for California income tax purposes, one hundred sixty-six dollars ($166) or an amount as adjusted under subdivision (b).

(2) If any person, other than an organization
 exempt from taxation under Section 23701, fails or refuses to make and file a tax return required by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part, within 25 days after formal legal demand to file the tax return is mailed to that person by the Franchise Tax Board, the Franchise Tax Board shall impose a filing enforcement cost recovery fee in the amount of:

(A) In the case of an individual, partnership, limited liability company classified as a partnership for California income tax purposes, or fiduciary, fifty-one dollars ($51) or an amount as adjusted under subdivision (b).

(B) In the case of a corporation or limited liability company classified as a corporation for California income tax purposes, one hundred nineteen dollars ($119) or an amount as adjusted under subdivision (b).

(b) For fees imposed under this section during the fiscal year 1993–94 and fiscal years thereafter, the amount of those fees shall be set to reflect actual costs and shall be specified in the annual Budget Act.

(c) Interest shall not accrue with respect to the cost recovery fees provided by this section.

(d) The amounts provided by this section are obligations imposed by this part and may be collected in any manner provided under this part for the collection of a tax.

(e) Subdivision (a) is operative with respect to the notices for payment or formal legal demands to file, either of which is mailed on or after September 15, 1992.

(f) The Franchise Tax Board shall determine the total amount of the cost recovery fees collected or accrued
 through June 30, 1993, and shall notify the Controller of that amount. The Controller shall transfer that amount to the Franchise Tax Board, and that amount is hereby appropriated to the board for the 1992–93 fiscal year for reimbursement of its collection and filing enforcement efforts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 37.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19255.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (e), after 20 years have lapsed from the date the latest tax liability for a taxable year or the date any other liability that is not associated with a taxable year becomes “due and payable” within the meaning of Section 19221, the Franchise Tax Board may not collect that amount and the taxpayer’s liability to the state for that liability is
 abated by reason of lapse of time. Any actions taken by the Franchise Tax Board to collect an uncollectible liability shall be released, withdrawn, or otherwise terminated by the Franchise Tax Board, and no subsequent administrative or civil action shall be taken or brought to collect all or part of that uncollectible amount. Any amounts received in contravention of this section shall be considered an overpayment that may be credited and refunded in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 19301) of Chapter 6.

(b) If a timely civil action filed pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 6 of this part is commenced, or a claim is filed in a probate action, the period for which the liability is collectable shall be extended and shall not expire until that liability, probate claim, or judgment against the taxpayer arising from that liability is satisfied or becomes unenforceable under the laws applicable to the enforcement of civil judgments.

(c) For purposes of this section, both of the following apply:

(1) “Tax liability” means a liability imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part, and includes any additions to tax, interest, penalties, fees and any other amounts relating to the imposed liability.

(2) If more than one liability is “due and payable” for a particular taxable year, with the exception of a liability resulting from a penalty imposed under Section 19777.5, the “due and payable” date that is later in time shall be the date upon which the 20-year limitation of subdivision (a) commences.

(d) This section does not apply to amounts subject to collection by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Article 5.5 or 7 of this
 chapter, or any other amount that is not a tax imposed under Part 10 or Part 11, but which the Franchise Tax Board is collecting as though it were a final personal income tax delinquency.

(e) (1) The expiration of the period of limitation on collection under this section shall be suspended for the following periods:

(A) The period during which the Franchise Tax Board is prohibited by reason of a bankruptcy case from collecting, plus six months thereafter.

(B) The period described under subdivision (d) of Section 19008 relating to installment payment agreements.

(C) The period during which collection is postponed by operation of law under Section 18571, related to postponement by reason of service in a combat zone, or under Section
 18572, related to postponement by reason of presidentially declared disaster or terroristic or military action.

(D) During any other period during which collection of a tax is suspended, postponed, or extended by operation of law.

(2) A suspension of the period of limitation under this subdivision applies with respect to both parties of any liability that is joint and several.

(f) This section shall be applied on and after July 1, 2006, to any liability “due and payable” before, on, or after that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 286.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19256.

The Franchise Tax Board may, in the allowance of any amount as a credit or refund, or in the collection of any amount as a deficiency or underpayment, of any tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), disregard a fractional part of a dollar unless it amounts to fifty cents ($0.50) or more, in which case it shall be increased to one dollar ($1).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19262.

(a) At any time within which an action can be brought to collect any delinquent amounts as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 19371) of Chapter 6, the Franchise Tax Board may collect the tax, together with penalties and interest, in the following manner: The Franchise Tax Board shall seize any personal property owned by the taxpayer against whom the tax is assessed, and thereafter sell at public auction the property so seized, or a sufficient portion thereof, to pay the tax due hereunder, together
 with any interest, and any penalty or penalties imposed hereby for that delinquency, and any and all costs that may have been incurred on account of the seizure and sale. Notice of the intended sale and the time and place thereof, shall be given to the delinquent taxpayer and to all persons appearing of record to have an interest in the property, in writing, at least 10 days before the date set for the sale by enclosing the notice in an envelope addressed to the taxpayer at its last known place of business in this state if any, and, in the case of any person appearing of record to have an interest in the property, addressed to that person at the last known place of residence, if any, and depositing the same in the United States mail, postage prepaid, and by publication for at least 10 days before the date set for the sale in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the property seized is to be sold; provided, however, that if there be no newspaper of general circulation in that
 county then by the posting of the notice in three public places in the county for the 10-day period. The notice shall contain a description of the property to be sold, together with a statement of the amount of the taxes, interest, penalties, and costs, the name of the taxpayer, and the further statement that, unless the taxes, interest, penalties, and costs are paid on or before the time fixed in the notice for the sale, the property, or so much thereof as may be necessary, will be sold in accordance with law and the notice.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term tax shall include any liability imposed pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 19131) of Chapter 4, and any interest imposed thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19263.

At any sale authorized by Section 19262, the property shall be sold by the Franchise Tax Board or its duly authorized agent in accordance with law and the notice of sale, and the Franchise Tax Board shall deliver to the purchaser a bill of sale for the property so sold and the bill of sale shall vest title in the purchaser. The unsold portion of any property so seized may be left at the place of sale at the risk of the taxpayer. If, upon any sale, the moneys so received exceed the amount of all taxes, interest, penalties and costs due the state from the
 taxpayer, any excess shall be returned to the taxpayer and a receipt therefor obtained. However, if any person having an interest in or lien upon the property has filed with the Franchise Tax Board prior to any sale notice of the interest or lien, the Franchise Tax Board shall withhold any excess pending a determination of the rights of the respective parties thereto by a court of competent jurisdiction.

If, for any reason, the receipt of the taxpayer is not available, the Franchise Tax Board shall deposit the excess moneys with the Treasurer, as trustee for the owner, subject to the order of the taxpayer or his or her trust or estate, or in the case of a corporation, its successor through reorganization, merger, or consolidation, or its stockholders upon dissolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19264.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, and 706.105 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the Franchise Tax Board may serve earnings withholding orders for taxes and any other notice or document required to be served or provided in connection with an earnings withholding order for taxes pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to government and private employers by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(b) Upon consent of the employer, the Franchise Tax Board may provide service by
 electronic transmission or other electronic technology under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, 706.125, and 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the Franchise Tax Board may receive the “employer’s return,” as described in Section 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(d) This section shall apply in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if this section had been incorporated in full into Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) This section shall apply to notices served or provided on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 297, Sec. 3.   (AB 3372)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19265.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 18670 or 18671, payments authorized pursuant to Section 8161 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall not be subject to withholding or levy for liabilities due under Section 10878, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 51, Sec. 3.   (AB 192)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19266.

(a) (1) The Franchise Tax Board, in coordination with financial institutions doing business in this state, shall operate a Financial Institution Record Match System utilizing automated data exchanges to the maximum extent
 feasible.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe any rules and regulations that may be necessary or appropriate to implement this section. These rules and regulations shall include all of the following:

(A) A structure by which financial institutions, or their designated data-processing agents, shall receive from the Franchise Tax Board the file or files of delinquent debtors that the institution shall match with its own list of accountholders to identify delinquent tax debtor accountholders at the institution.

(B) An option by which financial institutions without the technical ability to process the data exchange, or without the ability to employ a third-party data processor to process the data exchange, may forward to the Franchise Tax Board a list of all accountholders and their social security numbers or
 other taxpayer identification numbers, so that the Franchise Tax Board shall match that list with the file or files of delinquent tax debtors.

(C) Authority for the Franchise Tax Board to exempt a financial institution from the requirements of this section if the Franchise Tax Board determines that the financial institution participation would not generate sufficient revenue to be cost effective for the Franchise Tax Board.

(D) Authority for the Franchise Tax Board to temporarily suspend the requirements of this section for a financial institution if the financial institution provides the Franchise Tax Board with a written notice from its supervisory banking authority that it is determined to be undercapitalized, significantly undercapitalized, or critically undercapitalized as defined by FDIC Regulation 325.103(b)(3), (4), and (5) or NCUA Regulation 702.102. The notice provided
 pursuant to this subparagraph shall be subject to the protections of Section 19542.

(b) The Financial Institution Record Match System shall not be subject to any limitation set forth in Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 7460) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. However, any use of the information, other than information relating to an address, provided pursuant to this section for any purpose other than the collection of amounts identified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) shall be a violation of Section 19542.

(1) Delinquent amounts due the board, as imposed under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7280), Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601), Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 9401), Part 6 (commencing with Section 11201), Part 13 (commencing with
 Section 30001), Part 14 (commencing with Section 32001), Part 18.5 (commencing with Section 38101), Part 19 (commencing with Section 40001), Part 20 (commencing with Section 41001), Part 22 (commencing with Section 43001), Part 22.5 (commencing with Section 44000), Part 23 (commencing with Section 45001), Part 24 (commencing with Section 46001), Part 26 (commencing with Section 50101), Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001), or Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001).

(2) Delinquent amounts due the Employment Development Department, as imposed under the Unemployment Insurance Code, or other debts or penalty assessments referred to the Employment Development Department for collection.

(3) Delinquent franchise or income tax or other debts referred to the Franchise Tax Board for collection, as imposed under Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701), Part 10 (commencing with Section
 17001), this part, or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(c) (1) To effectuate the Financial Institution Record Match System, financial institutions subject to this section shall provide to the Franchise Tax Board on a quarterly basis the name, record address, and other addresses, social security number or other taxpayer identification number, and other identifying information for each delinquent tax debtor, as identified by the Franchise Tax Board by name and social security number or other taxpayer identification number, who maintains an account at the institution.

(2) The first data file created by the Franchise Tax Board for purposes of matching tax debtor records to financial institution accountholder records shall be limited to 600,000 tax debtor records. The number of tax debtor records included in a subsequent data file created by the Franchise
 Tax Board may be increased by no more than 600,000 tax debtor records greater than the number of tax debtor records included in the immediately preceding data file until all eligible tax debtor records are included in the data match file.

(d) Unless otherwise required by law, a financial institution furnishing a report or providing information to the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section shall not disclose to a depositor or an accountholder, or a codepositor or coaccountholder, that the name, address, social security number or other taxpayer identification number, or other identifying information of that delinquent tax debtor has been received from or furnished to the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) A financial institution shall incur no obligation or liability to any person arising from any of the following:

(1) Furnishing information to the Franchise Tax Board as required by this section.

(2) Failing to disclose to a depositor or accountholder that the name, address, social security number or other taxpayer identification number, or other identifying information of that delinquent tax debtor was included in the data exchange with the Franchise Tax Board required by this section.

(3) Any other action taken in good faith to comply with the requirements of this section.

(f) The Franchise Tax Board may institute civil proceedings to enforce this section.

(g) Any financial institution that willfully fails to comply with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Franchise Tax Board for the administration of delinquent tax collections, unless it
 is shown to the satisfaction of the Franchise Tax Board that the failure is due to reasonable cause, shall be assessed a penalty upon notice and demand of the Franchise Tax Board and collected in the same manner as tax. The penalty imposed under this section shall be in an amount equal to fifty dollars ($50) for each record not provided, but the total imposed on that financial institution for all such failures during any calendar year shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(h) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Account” means a demand deposit account, share or share draft account, checking or negotiable withdrawal order account, savings account, time deposit account, or money market mutual fund account, regardless of whether the account bears interest.

(2) “Financial institution” means:

(A) A depository institution, as defined in Section 1813(c) of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(B) An institution-affiliated party, as defined in Section 1813(u) of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(C) A federal credit union or state credit union, as defined in Section 1752 of Title 12 of the United States Code, including an institution-affiliated party of a credit union, as defined in Section 1786(r) of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(D) A benefit association, insurance company, safe deposit company, money-market fund, or similar entity authorized to do business in this state.

(3) “Delinquent tax debtor” means any of the following:

(A) Any person liable for any tax, fee, or surcharge amounts, and any penalty, interest, or other amounts required to be paid to the board, where the liability remains unpaid after 30 days from demand for payment by the board, and the person is not making current timely installment payments on the liability under an installment payment agreement as provided by law.

(B) Any person liable for any amounts required to be paid to the Employment Development Department or for any debts or penalty assessments referred to the Employment Development Department for collection and the person is not making current timely installment payments on the liability under an approved installment payment agreement as provided by law.

(C) Any person liable for any income or franchise tax or other debt referred to the Franchise Tax Board for
 collection as imposed under Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701), Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), this part, or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), including tax, penalties, interest, and fees, where the tax or debt, including the amount, if any, referred to the Franchise Tax Board for collection remains unpaid after 30 days from demand for payment by the Franchise Tax Board, and the person is not making current timely installment payments on the liability under an agreement pursuant to Section 19008.

(i) A financial institution shall be reimbursed by the Franchise Tax Board for actual costs incurred to implement this section. Upon receipt of an invoice from the financial institution, cost reimbursement by the Franchise Tax Board shall be limited to the following:

(1) For one-time startup costs of a financial institution, no more than two thousand five hundred
 dollars ($2,500).

(2) For data matching costs of a financial institution, other than one-time startup costs, no more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per calendar quarter.

(j) The first data exchange for purposes of matching tax debtor records to financial institution accountholder records shall occur no earlier than April 1, 2012.

(k) This section shall be operative 120 days after the effective date of Chapter 14 of the Statutes of 2011 and shall apply with respect to persons that are delinquent tax debtors on and after that date.

(1) Notwithstanding any other law, on or after January 1, 2013, and on a quarterly basis thereafter, the board and the Employment Development Department shall, in the format and manner specified by the Franchise Tax
 Board, provide their respective delinquent tax debtor information to the Franchise Tax Board for inclusion in the Financial Institution Record Match System.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall include the delinquent tax debtor information provided by the board and the Employment Development Department in its data file used to match delinquent tax debtor records to financial institution accountholder records.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide the board or the Employment Development Department, as applicable, with any matched financial institution accountholder record information resulting from the delinquent tax debtor information provided by the board or the Employment Development Department.

(4) The board and the Employment Development Department shall reimburse the Franchise Tax Board for any costs incurred
 by the Franchise Tax Board related to the implementation and administration of this section with respect to delinquent tax debtors described in subparagraph (A) or (B), respectively, of paragraph (3) of subdivision (h).

(l) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to information provided pursuant to this section before, on, and after the effective date of that act.
